apertium-nld-fry.fry.dix
    <pardef n="hark/je__vblex"> <!-- FIXME -->
      <e><p><l>je</l><r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jen</l><r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>t</l><r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jend</l><r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ende</l><r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>je</l><r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>est</l><r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>et</l><r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>je</l><r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>te</l><r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>test</l><r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>te</l><r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ten</l><r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l></l><r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="boart/sje__vblex">
      <e><p><l>sje</l><r>sje<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sjen</l><r>sje<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>sje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sjend</l><r>sje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>sjende</l><r>sje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>sje</l><r>sje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>est</l><r>sje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>et</l><r>sje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sje</l><r>sje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>e</l><r>sje<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>este</l><r>sje<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>sje<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>en</l><r>sje<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>sje</l><r>sje<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="kri/je__vblex">
      <e><p><l>je</l><r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jen</l><r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ge</l><r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>gen</l><r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jend</l><r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>jende</l><r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>j</l><r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gest</l><r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>jst</l><r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>get</l><r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>jt</l><r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>je</l><r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ge</l><r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gest</l><r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ge</l><r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gen</l><r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ich</l><r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ichst</l><r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ich</l><r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>j</l><r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="la/itsje__vblex">
      <e><p><l>itsje</l><r>itsje<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>itsjen</l><r>itsje<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ke</l><r>itsje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kend</l><r>itsje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>kende</l><r>itsje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>itsje</l><r>itsje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kest</l><r>itsje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ket</l><r>itsje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>itsje</l><r>itsje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ke</l><r>itsje<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kest</l><r>itsje<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ke</l><r>itsje<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ken</l><r>itsje<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>itsje</l><r>itsje<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="g/ean__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ean</l><r>ean<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ean</l><r>ean<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ien</l><r>ean<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ongen</l><r>ean<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eanend</l><r>ean<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>eanende</l><r>ean<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ean</l><r>ean<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iest</l><r>ean<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iet</l><r>ean<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eane</l><r>ean<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>yng</l><r>ean<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ong</l><r>ean<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ie</l><r>ean<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iest</l><r>ean<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yng</l><r>ean<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ong</l><r>ean<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ie</l><r>ean<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ienen</l><r>ean<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ongen</l><r>ean<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ean</l><r>ean<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="harkje"><i>hark</i><par n="hark/je__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="laitsje"><i>la</i><par n="la/itsje__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gean"><i>g</i><par n="g/ean__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="krije"><i>kri</i><par n="kri/je__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="boartsje"><i>boart</i><par n="boart/sje__vblex"/></e>
